Connecticut, session 2026, HB05244.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 32-462 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
applicable to income and taxable years commencing on and after January 1,
2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Agency" means the Department of Economic and Community
Development or Connecticut Innovations, Incorporated.
(2) "Financial assistance" means grants, loans, loan guarantees,
contracts of insurance, investments, or combinations thereof, which are
provided from the proceeds of bonds, notes or other obligations of the
state or an agency which constitute a debt or liability of the state or
which are secured by a special capital reserve fund payable from
amounts appropriated or deemed appropriated from the General Fund.
(3) "Applicant" means any eligible applicant seeking financial
assistance from an agency for a business project. The term "applicant"
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5244
shall not include any political subdivision of the state.
(4) "Business project" means a business proposal undertaken by one
or more applicants, but does not include housing unless undertaken in
combination with another unrelated type of business.
[(5) "Biotechnology business project" means any commercial project
to be used or occupied by any person to conduct laboratory activity
relating to, or the research, development or manufacture of, biologically
active molecules or devices that apply to, affect or analyze biological
processes.]
(b) (1) No agency or agencies may award more than a total of [ten]
twenty-five million dollars of financial assistance during any two-year
period to an applicant or for a business project unless such financial
assistance is specifically authorized by an act of the General Assembly
which has been enacted before, on or after July 1, [1994] 2026. (2) The
provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply to any
awards funded or to be funded by bonds authorized to be issued by the
State Bond Commission before July 1, 1994.
[(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section,
no agency or agencies may award more than twenty million dollars of
financial assistance for a biotechnology business project during any two-
year period unless such financial assistance is specifically authorized by
an act of the General Assembly which has been enacted before, on or
after July 1, 2001.]
Sec. 2. Section 31-51r of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Employer" means any person engaged in business who has
twenty-six or more employees, including the state and any political
subdivision thereof.
(2) "Employee" means any person engaged in service to an employer
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5244
in the business of [his] the employer.
(3) "Employment promissory note" means any instrument or
agreement executed on or after October 1, 1985, which requires an
employee to pay the employer, or [his] the employer's agent or assignee,
a sum of money if the employee leaves such employment before the
passage of a stated period of time. "Employment promissory note"
includes any such instrument or agreement which states such payment
of moneys constitutes reimbursement for training previously provided
to the employee, but does not include a promissory note entered into by
an employer and employee for the full or partial repayment of any fee
relating to a federal H-1B visa and paid by an employer on behalf of an
employee.
(b) On or after October 1, 1985, no employer may require, as a
condition of employment, any employee or prospective employee to
execute an employment promissory note. The execution of an
employment promissory note as a condition of employment is against
public policy and any such note shall be void. If any such note is part of
an employment agreement, the invalidity of such note shall not affect
the other provisions of such agreement.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit or render void any
agreement between an employer and an employee (1) requiring the
employee to repay to the employer any sums advanced to such
employee, (2) requiring the employee to pay the employer for any
property it has sold or leased to such employee, (3) requiring
educational personnel to comply with any terms or conditions of
sabbatical leaves granted by their employers, or (4) entered into as part
of a program agreed to by the employer and its employees' collective
bargaining representative.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5244
Section 1 July 1, 2026, and 32-462
applicable to income and
taxable years commencing
on and after January 1,
2026
Sec. 2 from passage 31-51r
CE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4